District of Columbia statutes.
23-1906

Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter requiring notice to the victim shall be applicable when computer systems are in place at the Metropolitan Police Department or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to provide such notice or one year after the effective date of this chapter [June 8, 2001], whichever occurs first, and will apply only to crimes committed on or after that date.

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 302(b), 47 DCR 7039